Utah statutes.
77-27-26.   Deputization of agents to effect return of parole and probation violators.

(1) (a)  The official administrator of the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers is authorized and empowered to deputize any person to act as an officer and agent of this state in carrying out the return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state.

(b)  In any matter relating to the return of a violator described in Subsection (1)(a), any deputized agent shall have all the powers of a peace officer of this state.

(2)  Any deputization of any person pursuant to this section shall be in writing and the deputized agent shall:

(a)  carry formal evidence of his deputization; and

(b)  produce the evidence of deputization upon demand.

(3)  The official administrator of the interstate compact is authorized, subject to the approval of the governor, to enter into contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for the purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state.



Amended by Chapter 282, 1998 General Session

